Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 14. Dissolution

Cross references. —

As to dissolution of a corporation formed under the Wyoming Industrial Corporation Act, see §

17-11-116

.

As to dissolution of limited partnerships, see §

17-14-901

et seq.

As to dissolution of nonprofit corporations, see §

17-19-128

.

As to dissolution of partnership under Uniform Partnership Act, see §

17-21-801

et seq.

As to dissolution of limited liability companies, see §

17-29-701

et seq.

As to dissolution of lodge, and societies, see §

26-29-230

.

As to dissolution of corporation upon judgment against corporation in action of quo warranto, see §§

1-31-118

through

1-31-121

.

As to appointment of receivers by district court, and as to qualifications, powers and duties of appointees, see chapter 33 of title 1.

As to reorganization of banks, see chapter 4 of title 13.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

19 Am. Jur. 2d Corporations §§ 2248 to 2498.

Dissolution of corporation on ground of intracorporate deadlock or dissention, 13 ALR2d 1260.

Stockholders' rights to patent, copyright or trademark owned by corporation upon its dissolution, 30 ALR2d 938.

Jurisdiction of action involving internal affairs of foreign corporation, 72 ALR2d 1211.

Service of process on dissolved domestic corporation in the absence of express statutory direction, 75 ALR2d 1399.

Dissolving or winding up affairs of corporation domiciled in another state, 19 ALR3d 1279.

Dissolution of corporation on ground of intracorporate deadlock or dissention, 83 ALR3d 458.

Reinstatement of repealed, forfeited, expired or suspended corporate charter as validating interim acts of corporation, 42 ALR4th 392.

Liability of shareholders, directors and officers where corporate business is continued after its dissolution, 72 ALR4th 419.

Liability of dissolved corporation or corporation that forfeited charter in action pursuant to Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act (CERCLA) (42 USC §§ 9601 - 9675), 123 ALR Fed 461.

19 C.J.S. Corporations §§ 811 to 882.